District of Columbia statutes.
19-508

Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among the states enacting it.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 202, 48 DCR 2087
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (1993 Act).